Wisconsin, session 2025, SB735.
do enact as follows:SB735,11Section 1. 66.1110 (2) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB735,2,3266.1110 (2) (am) Whether the neighborhood improvement district may 3approve a special charge under sub. (8).SB735,24Section 2. 66.1110 (8) of the statutes is created to read:SB735,2,10566.1110 (8) (a) Notwithstanding sub. (3) (a), and subject to par. (c), a 6municipality may create a neighborhood improvement district with authority to 7approve a special charge upon petition for a neighborhood improvement district 8with authority to approve a special charge by all owners of real property subject to 9general real estate taxes located in the proposed neighborhood improvement 10district. and satisfaction of the conditions under sub. (3).SB735,3,811(b) Upon approval by the local legislative body of a neighborhood improvement 12district operating plan approving the imposition of a special charge, a municipality 13shall impose a special charge on the parcels within the initial neighborhood 14improvement district. All proceeds of a special charge imposed under this 1subsection shall fund infrastructure related to residential development within the 2neighborhood improvement district. Notwithstanding s. 66.0627 (4), a special 3charge imposed under this subsection may be collected in installments and may be 4included in the current or next tax roll for collection and settlement under ch. 74 5even if the special charge is not delinquent. If a municipality authorizes the 6collection of a special charge under this paragraph in installments, the 7municipality shall designate the maximum number of years over which the 8installments may be made.SB735,3,109(c) All of the following apply to a neighborhood improvement district operating 10plan approving a special charge:SB735,3,14111. The operating plan shall include a description of infrastructure to be 12funded by special charge. Infrastructure that may be funded by special charge 13includes only infrastructure related to residential development within the 14neighborhood improvement district.SB735,3,17152. The operating plan shall include the repayment amounts that will be 16attributed to each parcel in the neighborhood improvement district or the method 17by which these amounts will be determined.SB735,3,2018(d) 1. A municipality may forgo the mailed notice under sub. (3) (c) and (e) for 19a neighborhood improvement district under this subsection if all property in the 20neighborhood improvement district is owned by a single person.SB735,4,2212. Subsection (4) (a) does not apply until at least 5 persons own real property 22within the neighborhood improvement district. If fewer than 5 persons own real 23property within the neighborhood improvement district, the board shall consist of a 1designee of each owner of real property within the neighborhood improvement 2district.SB735,4,53(e) The termination of a neighborhood improvement district under this 4subsection does not affect the enforceability of a special charge imposed under par. 5(b).SB735,36Section 3. 709.03 (form) E3m. of the statutes is created to read:SB735,4,77709.03 (form) - See PDF for table SB735,48Section 4. 709.033 (form) D2m. of the statutes is created to read:SB735,4,99709.03 (form) - See PDF for table SB735,510Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.SB735,4,1511(1) Notwithstanding s. 709.035, the treatment of ss. 709.03 (form) E3m. and 12709.033 (form) D2m. does not require a property owner who has furnished to a 13prospective buyer of the property an original or amended report before the effective 14date of this subsection to submit an amended report with respect to the information 15required by ss. 709.03 (form) E3m. and 709.033 (form) D2m.SB735,616Section 6. Initial applicability.SB735,4,1817(1) The treatment of ss. 709.03 (form) E3m. and 709.033 (form) D2m. first 18applies to a report that is furnished on the effective date of this subsection.SB735,719Section 7. Effective date.SB735,5,31(1) The treatment of ss. 709.03 (form) E3m. and 709.033 (form) D2m. and 2Sections 5 (1) and 6 (1) of this act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month 3beginning after publication.SB735,5,44